Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,208
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

(MBCA 15.06) (a) If the corporate
name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of section
21-230, the foreign corporation to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority
to transact business in this state:

(1) May add to its corporate
name for use in this state the word corporation, incorporated, company, or
limited, or the abbreviation corp., inc., co., or ltd.; or

(2) May use a fictitious
name to transact business in this state if its real name is unavailable and
it delivers to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the resolution
of its board of directors, certified by its secretary, adopting the fictitious
name.

(b)
Except as authorized by subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the corporate
name, including a fictitious name, of a foreign corporation must not be deceptively
similar to, upon the records of the Secretary of State:

(1) The corporate name of
a corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state;

(2) A corporate name reserved
or registered under section 21-231 or 21-232;

(3) The fictitious name of another foreign
corporation authorized to transact business in this state;

(4) The corporate name of
a not-for-profit corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business
in this state;

(5)
A trade name registered in this state pursuant to sections 87-208 to 87-219.01;
and

(6)
Any other business entity name registered or filed with the Secretary of State
pursuant to the law of this state.

(c) A foreign corporation may apply to the Secretary
of State for authorization to use in this state the name of another corporation
or business entity, incorporated or authorized to transact business in this
state, that is deceptively similar to, upon the records of the Secretary of
State, the name applied for. The Secretary of State shall authorize use of
the name applied for if:

(1)
The other corporation or business entity consents to the use in writing; or

(2) The applicant delivers
to the Secretary of State a certified copy of a final judgment of a court
of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name
applied for in this state.

(d)
A foreign corporation may use in this state the name, including the fictitious
name, of another domestic or foreign corporation or business entity that is
used in this state if the other corporation or business entity is incorporated
or authorized to transact business in this state and the foreign corporation:

(1) Has merged with the other
corporation or business entity;

(2) Has been formed by reorganization of the other
corporation or business entity; or

(3) Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets,
including the corporate name, of the other corporation or business entity.

(e) If a foreign corporation
authorized to transact business in this state changes its corporate name to
one that does not satisfy the requirements of section 21-230, it may not transact
business in this state under the changed name until it adopts a name satisfying
the requirements of section 21-230 and obtains an amended certificate of authority
under section 21-2,206.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 208.
January 1, 2017